Illinois, session 104th, HB765.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Benefits Exchange Law is 5amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 122/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Illinois Health Benefits Exchange Law.9(Source: P.A. 97-142, eff. 7-14-11.)